Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1549
Council; adopt rules and regulations.

In addition to other powers and duties, the council shall have the power to propose and to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions, purposes, and intent of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 16;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 7.
September 30, 2025